dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- जेठो; जेठ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जेठ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बबुरो; बबुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बबुर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सीमा; सीम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सीम/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ित</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छोटो; छोट; 2 -->
    <pardef n="छोट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अंध्यारो; अंध्यारो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अंध्यारो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नकच्चरी; नकच्चरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नकच्चरी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चेप्टो; चेप्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चेप्ट/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अगुल्ठिनी; अगुल्ठिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अगुल्ठिनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुढाथो; बुढाथो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बुढाथो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झिनो; झिनो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झिनो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सौतेनी; सौतेनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सौतेनी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संसद; संसद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संसद__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीय</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सस्तो; सस्त; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सस्त/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छाडा; छाडा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छाडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नयाँ; नयाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नयाँ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुकिलो; सुकिल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सुकिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झुटो; झुटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झुटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विचरो; विचरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विचरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- केन्द्र; केन्द्र; 2 -->
    <pardef n="केन्द्र__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीय</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्राप्त; प्राप्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्राप्त__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चम्किलो; चम्किल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चम्किल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भरपर्दो; भरपर्द; 2 -->
    <pardef n="भरपर्द/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिचरो; बिचरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिचरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धमिलो; धमिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धमिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनाउँदी; भनाउँदी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनाउँदी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कायम; कायम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कायम__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोझो; सोझ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="सोझ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनाउँदो; भनाउँद; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनाउँद/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दरो; दरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घरबुढो; घरबुढ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घरबुढ/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दोबाटो; दोबाटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दोबाटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मझौलो; मझौल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मझौल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कच्चा; कच्चा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कच्चा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ईतिहास; ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="/ईतिहास__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ऐतिहासिक</l>
          <r>ईतिहास<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्धो; अन्ध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्ध/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जाडो; जाडो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जाडो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोरो; मो; 2 -->
    <pardef n="मो/रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>टी</l>
          <r>रो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रा</l>
          <r>रो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फराकिलो; फराकिल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="फराकिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साहिंलो; साहिंल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साहिंल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="जेठो"><i>जेठ</i><par n="जेठ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बबुरो"><i>बबुर</i><par n="बबुर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सीमा"><i>सीम</i><par n="सीम/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छोटो"><i>छोट</i><par n="छोट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अंध्यारो"><i>अंध्यारो</i><par n="अंध्यारो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नकच्चरी"><i>नकच्चरी</i><par n="नकच्चरी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चेप्टो"><i>चेप्ट</i><par n="चेप्ट/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अगुल्ठिनी"><i>अगुल्ठिनी</i><par n="अगुल्ठिनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बुढाथो"><i>बुढाथो</i><par n="बुढाथो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झिनो"><i>झिनो</i><par n="झिनो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सौतेनी"><i>सौतेनी</i><par n="सौतेनी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संसद"><i>संसद</i><par n="संसद__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सस्तो"><i>सस्त</i><par n="सस्त/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छाडा"><i>छाडा</i><par n="छाडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नयाँ"><i>नयाँ</i><par n="नयाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सुकिलो"><i>सुकिल</i><par n="सुकिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झुटो"><i>झुटो</i><par n="झुटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विचरो"><i>विचरो</i><par n="विचरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="केन्द्र"><i>केन्द्र</i><par n="केन्द्र__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्राप्त"><i>प्राप्त</i><par n="प्राप्त__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चम्किलो"><i>चम्किल</i><par n="चम्किल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भरपर्दो"><i>भरपर्द</i><par n="भरपर्द/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बिचरो"><i>बिचरो</i><par n="बिचरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धमिलो"><i>धमिलो</i><par n="धमिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भनाउँदी"><i>भनाउँदी</i><par n="भनाउँदी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कायम"><i>कायम</i><par n="कायम__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सोझो"><i>सोझ</i><par n="सोझ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="भनाउँदो"><i>भनाउँद</i><par n="भनाउँद/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दरो"><i>दरो</i><par n="दरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="घरबुढो"><i>घरबुढ</i><par n="घरबुढ/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दोबाटो"><i>दोबाटो</i><par n="दोबाटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मझौलो"><i>मझौल</i><par n="मझौल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कच्चा"><i>कच्चा</i><par n="कच्चा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ईतिहास"><i></i><par n="/ईतिहास__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्धो"><i>अन्ध</i><par n="अन्ध/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जाडो"><i>जाडो</i><par n="जाडो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोरो"><i>मो</i><par n="मो/रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फराकिलो"><i>फराकिल</i><par n="फराकिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साहिंलो"><i>साहिंल</i><par n="साहिंल/ो__adj"/></e>
